Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1942YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 815.10, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 6. An attorney appointed under this section is not 3 liable to a person represented by the attorney for damages 4 as a result of a conviction in a criminal case unless the 5 court determines in a postconviction proceeding or on direct 6 appeal that the personâs conviction resulted from ineffective 7 assistance of counsel, and the ineffective assistance of 8 counsel is the proximate cause of the damage. In juvenile or 9 civil proceedings, an attorney appointed under this section 10 is not liable to a person represented by the attorney for 11 damages unless it has been determined that the attorney has 12 provided ineffective assistance of counsel, and the ineffective 13 assistance of counsel is the proximate cause of the damage. 14 A noncontract attorney appointed under this section, without 15 the consent of the attorney, who is accused of ineffective 16 assistance of counsel shall be treated as a state employee 17 under chapter 669, including defense and indemnification under 18 section 669.21. 19